apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="t/ento__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ento</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ento</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ohto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ohto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ohto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omuto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omuto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omuto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ohto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ento</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>úto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>outo</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ento</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ento</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plurals -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmito</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmito</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmito</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýmito</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ýchto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íto</l>
          <r>ento<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieto</l>

    <e lm="tento"><i>t</i><par n="t/ento__det"/></e>
